Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6123.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 44-5-20.02 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-20.02. Central Falls — Property tax classification — List of ratable property.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision within § 44-5-11.8 to the contrary, on or before June 1,
except in 1990, in which case the time is thirty (30) days after June 1, 1990, the assessor in the city
of Central Falls, after certification for classification, shall submit to the director of revenue a list
containing the true, full, and fair cash value of the ratable estate and motor vehicles and shall
classify and provide a tax rate for the property according to the following use:
(1) “Class 1” includes residential property which is owner-occupied dwellings of no more
than five (5) units and which is property used or held for human habitation, including rooming
houses and mobile homes with facilities designed and used for living, sleeping, cooking, and eating
on a non-transient basis. Eligibility for the owner-occupied tax classification shall be determined
by compliance with § 44-3-34 and relevant city ordinances. This property includes accessory land,
buildings, or improvements incidental to the habitation and used exclusively by the residents of the
property or their guests. This property does not include a hotel, motel, commercial, or industrial
property.
(2) “Class 2” includes residential property which is owner-occupied dwellings of more than
five (5) units and non-owner-occupied dwellings, including the residential portion of properties for
mixed use as residential and commercial properties, and which is property used or held for human

habitation, including rooming houses and mobile homes with facilities designed and used for living,
sleeping, cooking, and eating on a non-transient basis. This property includes accessory land,
buildings, or improvements incidental to the habitation and used exclusively by the residents of the
property or their guests. This property includes open space including “farmland,” “forestland,” and
“open space land” as defined in accordance with § 44-27-2. This property does not include a hotel,
motel, commercial, or industrial property.
(3) “Class 3” includes personal property, previously subject to tax, and includes all goods,
chattels, and effects, wherever they may be, except those that are exempt from taxation by the laws
of the United States or of this state.
(4) “Class 4” includes every vehicle and trailer registered under chapter 3 of title 31.
(5) “Class 5” includes property used commercially, including the commercial portion of
properties for mixed use as residential and commercial properties or for industrial manufacturing.
(b) The city of Central Falls may, by ordinance adopted by the city council, provide for tax
classification of property and tax rates in the city of Central Falls based on the five (5) classes
outlined in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The effective tax rate for Class 2 shall not exceed by two (2) times, the effective tax
rate for Class 1; the effective tax rate for Class 5 shall not exceed by three (3) times, the effective
tax rate for Class 1; and the effective tax rate for Class 3 shall not exceed by four (4) times, the
effective tax rate for Class 1 remain at the fixed rate of thirty-eight dollars and thirty-three cents
($38.33) per one thousand dollars ($1,000) that was present at the passage of § 44-5-12.2.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002515/SUB A
========
LC002515/SUB A - Page 2 of 3